Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB864.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1786(d) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1786. Required financial responsibility.* * *(d) Suspension of registration and operating privilege.--* * *(1.2) The department may not impose the penalties under this subsection if the owner of a motor vehicle or the insurer of the motor vehicle furnishes proof of the required financial responsibility to the department within ten days of the alleged violation.* * *(e.1) Obligations upon issuance of new policy.--An insurer 12345678910111213141516171819 that has issued a new contract of motor vehicle liability insurance and knows or has reason to believe that the new contract is for the purpose of providing proof of financial responsibility shall notify the department that the new contract has been issued. The insurer shall notify the department not later than ten days after the effective date of the policy of insurance.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0864PN0967 - 2 - 123456789